District of Columbia statutes.
7-2361.12

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 13, 57 DCR 3655
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.